apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="ateist__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ateist_\s__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\s_LR_Ø\S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\s_LR_Ø\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ateist_no-cp__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="residens__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne; Like ateist__n but for lemmas ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL">       <p><l></l> <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="'_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="residens_no-cp__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne; Like ateist__n but for lemmas ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\'__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="verd/en__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~(en) / ~(e)ner / ~(e)nerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enen</l>    <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ener</l>    <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ner</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enerne</l>  <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nerne</l>   <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vindue__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="dække__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="alibi__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="alibi_\s__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\s_LR_Ø\S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="alibi_no-cp__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="arbejdsdeling">   <i>arbejdsdeling</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="art">             <i>art</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="arveprins">       <i>arveprins</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="morgenavis">            <i>morgenavis</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="bil">             <i>bil</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="billard">         <i>billard</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="bindestreg">      <i>bindestreg</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="børs">            <i>børs</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="danseplads" a="PT" c="domain:fritid"><i>danseplads</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="digitalisering">  <i>digitalisering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="diskotek">        <i>diskotek</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="ed">              <i>ed</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="festival">        <i>festival</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="forræderi">       <i>forræderi</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="frugt">           <i>frugt</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="gav">             <i>gav</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="grusplads" a="PT"><i>grusplads</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="hjemstavnsforening"><i>hjemstavnsforening</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="hummer" a="DAINF"><i>hummer</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="ide">             <i>ide</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="indgriben">       <i>indgrib</i><par n="verd/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="intelligens">     <i>intelligens</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="kontorchef">      <i>kontorchef</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="koordinat">       <i>koordinat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="kro">             <i>kro</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="krus" a="PT">     <i>krus</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="markedsplads">    <i>markedsplads</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="mol">             <i>mol</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="monument">        <i>monument</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="mos">             <i>mos</i><par n="residens_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="nedrustning">     <i>nedrustning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="plads">           <i>plads</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="kødprodukt">         <i>kødprodukt</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="raffinering">     <i>raffinering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="ro">              <i>ro</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="rus">             <i>rus</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="slå">             <i>slå</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="socialdemokrati"> <i>socialdemokrati</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="fingerspids">           <i>fingerspids</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="stolthed">        <i>stolthed</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="tivoli">          <i>tivoli</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="tro">             <i>tro</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="usikkerhed">      <i>usikkerhed</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="ve">              <i>ve</i><par n="alibi_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="verden">          <i>verd</i><par n="verd/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="vindue">          <i>vindue</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="ånd">             <i>ånd</i><par n="ateist_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="leje">                      <i>leje</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="lære">                      <i>lære</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="genmæle">                      <i>genmæle</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="natarbejde">                <i>natarbejde</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="prismærke">                  <i>prismærke</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="skue">                       <i>skue</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="smask">                     <i>smask</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="soveværelse">                <i>soveværelse</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="vejdække">                  <i>vejdække</i><par n="dække__n"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="skydække">                  <i>skydække</i><par n="dække__n"/></e>
<e lm="asfaltdække"><i>asfaltdække</i><par n="dække__n"/></e>
<e lm="dyrskue"><i>dyrskue</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="grusdække"><i>grusdække</i><par n="dække__n"/></e>
<e lm="isdække"><i>isdække</i><par n="dække__n"/></e>
<e lm="reklamemateriale"><i>reklamemateriale</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="skindtæppe"><i>skindtæppe</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="skovkant"><i>skovband</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="-bogstav"><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-bogstav</i><par n="alibi_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="-million"><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-million</i><par n="ateist_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="-hul"><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-hul</i><par n="alibi_\s__n"/></e>
